Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 430.387 is amended to read:
430.387. The Oregon Health Authority shall cause the moneys in the Drug  Treatment and Re-
covery Services Fund to be distributed as follows:
(1) An  amount necessary for the administration of ORS 430.388 to 430.390[ , excluding amounts
necessary to establish and maintain the telephone hotline described in ORS 430.391 (1) ].
(2) After the distribution set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, the remaining moneys in the
fund shall be distributed to the grants program as set forth in ORS 430.389.
SECTION 2.  ORS 430.388 is amended to read:
430.388. (1) The Oversight and Accountability Council is established for the purpose of  [ over-
seeing the  implementation of the Behavioral Health Resource Networks pursuant to ] advising the
Oregon Health Authority on the grant program described in  ORS 430.389 , including but not
limited to advising the authority on:
(a) Funding priorities;
(b) Funding distribution; and
(c) An educational campaign to increase awareness of services .
(2) The members of the council shall be qualified individuals with  experience in substance use
treatment and other addiction services and consist of:
(a) At least  one member from each of the following categories appointed by the [ director] Di-
rector of the Oregon Health Authority :
[(A) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority, Health Systems Division Behavioral  Health
Services as a nonvoting member; ]
[(B)] (A) Three members  of communities that have been disproportionately impacted by [ arrests,
prosecution or  sentencing for conduct that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation ]
criminal justice involvement related to drug use ;
[(C)] (B) A physician specializing in addiction medicine;
[(D)] (C) A licensed clinical social worker;
[(E)] (D) An evidence-based substance use treatment provider;
[(F)] (E) A harm reduction services provider;
[(G)] (F) A person specializing  in housing services for people with substance use or a diagnosed
co-occurring substance use disorder and  mental health condition;
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 1
[(H)] (G) An academic researcher specializing in drug use or drug policy;
[(I)] (H) At least two people who suffered or suffer from substance use;
[(J)] (I) At least two recovery peers;
[(K)] (J) A mental or behavioral health care provider;
[(L)] (K) A representative of a coordinated care organization; [ and]
[(M)] (L) A  person who works for a nonprofit organization that advocates for persons who ex-
perience or have experienced substance use; [ and]
(M) A representative of community mental health programs; and
(N) A representative of the Association of Oregon Counties;
(b) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission or the director’s [ designated staff
person, as an ex officio nonvoting member ] designee;
(c) The Director of Human Services or the director’s designee;
(d) The executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission or  the executive
director’s designee; and
(e) A member nominated by the Commission on Indian  Services to represent the nine
federally recognized tribes in Oregon .
(3) The [ director] Director of the Oregon Health Authority  shall appoint an executive director
who shall report to and be responsible for the duties  assigned by the director of the division within
the authority that is responsible for behavioral health in consultation with the council.
(4) The members of the council shall select a chair or cochairs.  A quorum consists of  a
majority of the members of the council.
(5) The term of office for a member of the council is four years.  Members are eligible for reap-
pointment. If there is a vacancy for  any cause, the director shall make an appointment to become
immediately available for the  unexpired term plus two years, but not more than a total of four years.
(6)(a) To the extent permissible by law, a member of the  council performing services for the
council may receive compensation from the member’s employer for time spent  performing services
as a council member.
(b) If a member of the council is not compensated by the member’s  employer as set forth in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, that member shall  be entitled to compensation and expenses as
provided in ORS 292.495.
(7) Members of the council are subject to and must comply with the  provisions of ORS chapter
244, including ORS 244.045 (4), 244.047, 244.120 and 244.130.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 430.389, as amended by section 68, chapter 70, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
430.389. (1) [The Oversight and Accountability  Council shall approve grants and funding provided
by the  Oregon Health Authority in accordance with this section to implement Behavioral Health Re-
source Networks and increase access  to community care. ] The Oregon Health Authority shall ad-
minister, in consultation with the Oversight and Accountability Council, a grant program  to
implement Behavioral Health Resource Networks and increase statewide access to  and
awareness of the services  described in subsection (2)(e) of this section. A Behavioral Health
Resource Network is an entity or collection of  entities that individually or jointly provide some or
all of the services described in subsection (2)(e) of this section.
(2)(a) The authority shall establish an equitable:
(A) Process for applying for grants  and funding by agencies or organizations, whether govern-
ment or community based, to establish Behavioral Health Resource  Networks for the purposes of
immediately screening the acute needs of individuals with substance use, including those  who also
have a mental  illness, and assessing and addressing any ongoing needs through ongoing case man-
agement, harm reduction, treatment, housing and linkage to other care and services.
(B) Evaluation process to  assess the effectiveness of Behavioral Health Resource Networks that
receive grants or funding.
(b) Recipients of grants or funding  must be licensed, certified or credentialed by the state, in-
cluding certification under ORS 743A.168 (9), or meet criteria prescribed by rule by the  authority
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 2
under ORS 430.390. A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the  grant
or funding to supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(c) The [ council and the ] authority shall ensure that residents of each county  have access to all
of the services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(d) Applicants for grants  and funding may apply individually or jointly with other network par-
ticipants to provide services in one or more counties.
(e) A network must have the capacity  to provide the following services and any other services
specified by the authority by rule  but no individual participant in a network is required to provide
all of the services:
(A) Screening by  certified addiction peer support or wellness specialists or other qualified per-
sons designated by the [ council] authority  to determine a client’s need for immediate  medical or
other treatment to determine what acute care is needed and where  it can be best provided, identify
other needs and link  the client to other appropriate local or statewide services, including treatment
for substance use and coexisting health problems, housing,  employment, training and child care.
[Networks shall provide this service 24 hours a day, seven days a week, every calendar day of  the year
through a telephone  line or other means. Networks may rely on the statewide telephone hotline estab-
lished by the authority under ORS 430.391 for telephone screenings during  nonbusiness hours such as
evenings, weekends and holidays. ] A network shall provide a screening within 48 hours of initial
client contact.  Notwithstanding paragraph (c)  of this subsection, only one grantee in each network
within each county is required to provide the screenings described in this subparagraph.
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health needs  assessment, including a substance use screening by
a certified alcohol and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment  professional. The
assessment shall prioritize the self-identified needs of a client.
(C) Individual  intervention planning, case management and connection to services. If, after the
completion of a screening, a client indicates a desire to address some or all of the identified needs,
a case manager shall work with the client to design an individual intervention plan. The plan  must
address the client’s need for substance use treatment, coexisting health problems,  housing, employ-
ment and training, child care and other services.
(D) Ongoing  peer counseling and support from screening and assessment through implementation
of individual intervention plans as well as peer  outreach workers to engage directly with
marginalized community members who could potentially benefit from the network’s services.
(E) Assessment of the need for, and provision of, mobile or virtual outreach services to:
(i) Reach clients who are unable to access the network; and
(ii) Increase public awareness of network services.
(F) Harm reduction services and information and education about harm reduction services.
(G) Low-barrier substance use treatment.
(H) Transitional and supportive housing for individuals with substance use.
(f) If an applicant for a grant or funding under this subsection is unable to provide  all of the
services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection, the applicant may identify how  the applicant
intends to partner with other entities to provide  the services, and the authority [ and the council ]
may facilitate collaboration among applicants.
(g) All services provided through  the networks must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed,
culturally specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental. The goal shall be
to address effectively the client’s substance use and any other social determinants of health.
(h) The networks must be adequately staffed to address the needs of  people with substance use
within their regions as prescribed by the authority by rule, including, at a minimum, at  least one
person in each of the following categories:
(A) Alcohol and drug counselor certified by the authority or other credentialed addiction treat-
ment professional;
(B) Case manager;
(C) Addiction peer support specialist certified by the authority;
(D) Addiction peer wellness specialist certified by the authority;
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 3
(E) Recovery  mentor, certified by the Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board of
Oregon or its successor organization; and
(F) Youth support specialist certified by the authority.
(i) Verification of a screening by a certified addiction peer  support specialist, wellness specialist
or other person in accordance with paragraph  (e)(A) of this subsection shall promptly be provided
to the client by the entity conducting the screening. If the client executes a valid release of  infor-
mation, the entity shall provide verification of the screening to  the authority or a contractor of the
authority and the authority or the authority’s contractor shall forward  the verification to any entity
the client has authorized to receive the verification.
[(3)(a) If moneys remain in the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after the council  has
committed grants and funding to establish  behavioral health resource networks serving every county
in this state, the council shall authorize  grants and funding to other agencies or organizations, whether
government or community based, and to the  nine federally recognized tribes in this state and service
providers that are affiliated with the nine federally recognized tribes in this state  to increase access to
one or more of the following: ]
[(A) Low-barrier substance use  treatment that is evidence-informed, trauma-informed, culturally
specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental; ]
[(B) Peer support and recovery services; ]
[(C) Transitional, supportive and permanent housing for persons with substance use; ]
[(D) Harm reduction interventions including, but not limited to, overdose prevention education,  ac-
cess to short-acting opioid  antagonists, as defined in ORS 689.800, and sterile syringes and stimulant-
specific drug education and outreach; or ]
[(E) Incentives and supports to expand the behavioral health workforce to support the  services de-
livered by behavioral health resource networks  and entities receiving grants or funding under this
subsection.]
[(b) A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not  use the grant or funding to
supplant the recipient’s existing funding. ]
[(4)] (3) In awarding grants and funding under [ subsections (1) and (3) of ] this  section, the
[council] authority shall:
(a) Distribute grants and funding to ensure access to:
(A) Historically underserved populations; and
(B) Culturally specific and linguistically responsive services.
(b) Consider any inventories or surveys of currently available behavioral health services.
(c) Consider available regional data related to the  substance use treatment needs and the access
to culturally specific and linguistically responsive services in communities in this state.
(d) Consider the needs of  residents of this state for services, supports and treatment at all ages.
[(5)] (4) The [ council] authority shall require any government entity that applies for a grant  to
specify in the  application details regarding subgrantees and how the government entity will fund
culturally specific organizations and culturally specific services. A government entity receiving  a
grant must make an explicit commitment not to supplant or decrease any existing  funding used to
provide services funded by the grant.
[(6)] (5) In  determining grants and funding to be awarded, the [ council] authority may consult
the comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan established by  the Alcohol
and Drug Policy Commission under ORS 430.223 and the  advice of any other group, agency, organ-
ization or individual that desires to provide advice to the [ council] authority that is consistent  with
the terms of this section.
[(7)] (6) Services provided by grantees  funded under this section , including services provided
by a Behavioral Health Resource Network, shall be free of charge to  the clients receiving the ser-
vices.  Grantees  in each network shall seek reimbursement from insurance issuers, the medical as-
sistance program or any  other third party responsible for the cost of services provided to a client
and grants  and funding provided by the [ council or the ] authority under this section may be used for
copayments, deductibles or other out-of-pocket costs incurred by the client for the services.
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 4
[(8)] (7) Subsection [ (7)] (6) of this section does not  require the medical assistance program to
reimburse the cost of services for which another third party is responsible in violation of 42 U.S.C.
1396a(25).
SECTION 4.
 ORS 430.390 is amended to read:
430.390. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules that establish :
(A) A grant application process[ , a process to appeal  the denial of a grant ] and general criteria
and requirements for the Behavioral Health Resource  Networks and the grants and funding required
by ORS 430.389, including rules requiring recipients of  grants and funding to collect and report in-
formation necessary for the Secretary of State to conduct the financial and performance audits  re-
quired by ORS 430.392.
(B) A process to appeal the denial, in full or in part, of a grant application under  ORS
430.389. To the extent practicable, the  process shall be consistent with the process for pro-
testing the award of a public contract under ORS 279B.400 to 279B.425.
(b) When adopting or amending  rules under this subsection, the authority shall convene an ad-
visory committee in accordance with ORS 183.333 in which members  of the Oversight and Ac-
countability Council compose a majority of the membership.
[(2) The council shall have and retain the authority  to oversee the Behavioral Health Resource
Networks established under ORS 430.389 and approve the grants and funding under ORS 430.389. ]
[(3)] (2) The authority shall administer and provide all necessary support  to ensure the imple-
mentation of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, and that recipients of grants  or funding comply
with all applicable rules regulating the provision of behavioral health services.
[(4)(a)] (3)(a) The authority, in consultation with the council, may enter into interagency
agreements to ensure proper distribution of funds for the grants required by ORS 430.389.
(b) The authority shall encourage and take all  reasonable measures to ensure that grant recip-
ients cooperate, coordinate and act  jointly with one another to offer the services described in ORS
430.389.
(c) The authority  shall post to the authority’s website, at the time a grant or funding is awarded:
(A) The name of the recipient of the grant or funding;
(B) The names of any subgrantees  or subcontractors of the recipient of the grant or funding; and
(C) The amount of the grant or funding awarded.
[(5)] (4) The authority shall provide  requested technical, logistical and other support to the
council to assist the council with the council’s duties and obligations.
[(6)] (5) The  Department of Justice shall provide legal services to the council if requested by
the authority  to assist the council in carrying out the council’s duties and obligations.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 430.394 is amended to read:
430.394. [If approved by  the Oversight and Accountability Council, ] The Oregon Health Authority
may implement an education campaign to inform the public about  the availability of Behavioral
Health Resource Networks[ , the statewide hotline described in ORS 430.391 ] and any other informa-
tion the authority believes would benefit the public in accessing behavioral health services.
SECTION 6.  ORS 413.017 is amended to read:
413.017. (1)  The Oregon Health Policy Board shall establish the committees described in sub-
sections (2) to (5) of this section.
(2)(a) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall  include individuals who purchase
health care for the following:
(A) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(B) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(C) Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(D) A city government.
(E) A county government.
(F) A special district.
(G) Any private nonprofit organization that receives the majority of its funding  from the state
and requests to participate on the committee.
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 5
(b) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall:
(A) Identify and make specific recommendations to achieve uniformity  across all public health
benefit plan designs  based on the best available clinical evidence, recognized best practices for
health promotion and disease management,  demonstrated cost-effectiveness and shared demographics
among the enrollees within the pools covered by the benefit plans.
(B) Develop an action plan for ongoing collaboration to implement the benefit design  alignment
described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and shall  leverage purchasing to achieve benefit
uniformity if practicable.
(C) Continuously review and report to the Oregon Health  Policy Board on the committee’s
progress in aligning benefits while minimizing the cost shift to individual purchasers of insurance
without shifting costs to the private sector or the health insurance exchange.
(c) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall  work with the Public Health Benefit Purchasers
Committee to identify uniform provisions for state  and local public contracts for health benefit plans
that achieve maximum quality and cost outcomes. The board  shall collaborate with the committee
to develop steps to implement joint contract provisions. The committee shall  identify a schedule for
the implementation of  contract changes. The process for implementation of joint contract provisions
must include a review process to protect against unintended cost shifts to enrollees or agencies.
(3)(a) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall include individuals  who have the collective
expertise, knowledge and experience in a  broad range of health professions, health care education
and health care workforce development initiatives.
(b) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall coordinate efforts to recruit  and educate health
care professionals and retain  a quality workforce to meet the demand that will be created by the
expansion in health care coverage, system transformations and an increasingly diverse population.
(c) The Health  Care Workforce Committee shall conduct an inventory of all grants and other
state resources  available for addressing the need to expand the health care workforce to meet the
needs of Oregonians for health care.
(4)(a) The Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee shall include the following members appointed
by the Oregon Health Policy Board:
(A) An individual representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) An individual representing the Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(C) An individual representing the Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(D) An individual representing the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(E) Two health care providers;
(F) One individual representing hospitals;
(G) One individual representing insurers, large employers or multiple employer  welfare ar-
rangements;
(H) Two individuals representing health care consumers;
(I) Two individuals representing coordinated care organizations;
(J) One individual with expertise in health care research;
(K) One individual with expertise in health care quality measures; and
(L) One individual with expertise in mental health and addiction services.
(b) The committee shall work collaboratively  with the Oregon Educators Benefit Board, the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board,  the authority and the department to adopt health outcome and
quality measures  that are focused on specific goals and provide value to the state, employers,
insurers, health care providers and consumers. The committee  shall be the single body to align
health outcome and quality measures used in this  state with the requirements of health care data
reporting to ensure that the measures  and requirements are coordinated, evidence-based and focused
on a long term statewide vision.
(c) The committee shall use a public process that includes an opportunity for public  comment
to identify health outcome and quality measures. The health outcome and quality measures identified
by the  committee, as updated by the authority under paragraph (g) of this subsection, may be applied
to services provided by coordinated care organizations or paid for by health benefit  plans sold
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 6
through the health insurance exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators  Benefit Board or the
Public Employees’  Benefit Board. The authority, the department, the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board and the Public Employees’ Benefit Board are not required to adopt  all of the health outcome
and quality measures identified by the committee but may not adopt any health  outcome and quality
measures that are different from the measures identified by  the committee. The measures must take
into account the health outcome  and quality measures selected by the metrics and scoring subcom-
mittee created in ORS 413.022 and the differences in the populations served by  coordinated care
organizations and by commercial insurers.
(d) In identifying  health outcome and quality measures, the committee shall prioritize measures
that:
(A) Utilize existing state  and national health outcome and quality measures, including measures
adopted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,  that have been adopted or endorsed
by other state or national organizations and have a relevant state or national benchmark;
(B) Given the  context in which each measure is applied, are not prone to random variations
based on the size of the denominator;
(C) Utilize existing data systems, to  the extent practicable, for reporting the measures to mini-
mize redundant reporting and undue burden on the state, health benefit  plans and health care pro-
viders;
(D) Can be meaningfully adopted for a minimum of three years;
(E) Use a common format in the collection of the data and facilitate  the public reporting of the
data; and
(F) Can be reported in a  timely manner and without significant delay so that the most current
and actionable data is available.
(e) The committee shall evaluate on a regular and ongoing basis the health outcome and quality
measures identified under this section.
(f) The committee may convene subcommittees to focus on gaining expertise in  particular areas
such as data collection,  health care research and mental health and substance use disorders in order
to aid the committee in  the development of health outcome and quality measures. A subcommittee
may include stakeholders and staff  from the authority, the Department of Human Services, the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services, the Early Learning Council or  any other agency staff
with the appropriate expertise in the issues addressed by the subcommittee.
(g) The authority shall update annually, if necessary, the health  outcome and quality measures
identified by the committee to utilize the latest sets of core quality measures published by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1320b-9a and 1320b-9b.
(h) This subsection does not prevent the authority, the  Department of Consumer and Business
Services, commercial insurers,  the Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board from establishing programs that provide  financial incentives to providers for meeting specific
health outcome and quality measures adopted by the committee.
(5)(a) The  Behavioral Health Committee shall include the following members appointed by the
Director of the Oregon Health Authority:
(A) The chairperson of the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee;
(B) The chairperson of the committee appointed by the board to address health equity, if any;
(C) A behavioral health director for a coordinated care organization;
(D) A representative of a community mental health program;
(E) An individual with expertise in data analysis;
(F) A member of  the Consumer Advisory Council, established under ORS 430.073, that represents
adults with mental illness;
(G) A representative of the System of Care Advisory Council established in ORS 418.978;
(H) A member of the Oversight and Accountability  Council, [ described in ORS 430.389 ] estab-
lished under ORS 430.388, who represents adults with addictions or co-occurring conditions;
(I) One member representing a system of care, as defined in ORS 418.976;
(J) One consumer representative;
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 7
(K) One representative of a tribal government;
(L) One representative of an organization that advocates on behalf  of individuals with intellec-
tual or developmental disabilities;
(M) One representative of providers of behavioral health services;
(N) The director of the division  of the authority responsible for behavioral health services, as
a nonvoting member;
(O) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission appointed under ORS  430.220, as
a nonvoting member;
(P) The authority’s Medicaid director, as a nonvoting member;
(Q) A representative of the Department of Human Services, as a nonvoting member; and
(R) Any other member that the director deems appropriate.
(b) The board may modify the membership of the committee as needed.
(c) The division of the authority responsible for behavioral health  services and the director of
the division shall staff the committee.
(d) The committee, in collaboration with the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee, as  needed,
shall:
(A) Establish quality metrics for behavioral health services  provided by coordinated care or-
ganizations, health care providers, counties and other government entities; and
(B) Establish incentives to improve the quality of behavioral health services.
(e) The quality metrics and incentives shall be designed to:
(A) Improve timely access to behavioral health care;
(B) Reduce hospitalizations;
(C) Reduce overdoses;
(D) Improve the integration of physical and behavioral health care; and
(E) Ensure individuals are supported in the least restrictive  environment that meets their be-
havioral health needs.
(6) Members of the committees described in  subsections (2) to (5) of this section who are not
members of the Oregon Health Policy Board may receive compensation in  accordance with criteria
prescribed by the authority by rule and shall be reimbursed from  funds available to the board for
actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred by them by their attendance at  committee
meetings, in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 7.
 Section 6, chapter 248, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1)  Notwithstanding the terms of office specified in ORS 430.388, eight voting members
currently serving on the Oversight and  Accountability Council shall be reappointed for two-year
terms at the end of their current terms, including:
(a) At least one member from each category described in ORS 430.388  [ (2)(a)(B)] (2)(a)(A) ,
[(2)(a)(I)] (2)(a)(H) and [ (2)(a)(J)] (2)(a)(I) ; and
(b) Others chosen by lot.
(2) The successors to the members who are reappointed to  two-year terms shall be appointed to
four-year terms.
SECTION 8.
 Section 76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 76.  (1) As used in this section, “deflection program” means a  collaborative program be-
tween law enforcement  agencies and behavioral health entities that assists individuals who may
have substance use  disorder, another behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders, to create
community-based pathways to treatment, recovery support services, housing, case management  or
other services.
(2) The Oregon Behavioral  Health Deflection Program is established within the Improving
People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports  and Services Grant Review Committee
established under ORS 430.234. The program consists of grants awarded by  the committee to coun-
ties and federally recognized tribal governments to fund deflection programs.
(3)(a) The purpose of the program described in this section is to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 8
(A) Address the need for more deflection programs to assist individuals whose behavioral  health
conditions, including substance use  disorder, lead to interactions with law enforcement,
incarceration, conviction and other engagement with the criminal justice system.
(B) Track and report data concerning deflection program outcomes  in order to determine the
best practices for deflection programs within this state.
(b) ORS 430.230 to 430.236 do not apply to the program described in this section.
(4)(a) The committee shall develop a grant application process for awarding grants under this
section.
(b) An application for a grant under this section may be submitted by a county or the  designee
of a county, or by a tribal government or  designee of a tribal government. Only one application per
county may be submitted,  but the application may request funding multiple programs within a
county.
(c) Prior to submitting an application for a grant under this section, the  applicant shall coordi-
nate with all partners of the development and administration of the proposed deflection program to
ensure that the partners  have the resources necessary to implement the deflection program. The
partners shall include at least a district  attorney, a law enforcement agency, a community mental
health program established under ORS 430.620 and a provider from a  Behavioral Health Resource
Network established under ORS 430.389. Partners may also include a treatment provider,  a local
mental health authority, a tribal government, a peer support organization, a court or a  local gov-
ernment body.
(d) An application for a grant under this section must contain:
(A) A description of the  coordination with program partners required by paragraph (c) of this
subsection that has occurred;
(B) A description of the individuals who would be eligible for the program and what  qualifies
as a successful outcome, formulated in cooperation with the program partners described  in para-
graph (c) of this subsection;
(C) A description of how the program for which the applicant is seeking funding is culturally
and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed and evidence-based;
(D) A description of a  plan to address language access barriers when communicating program
referral options and program procedures to non-English speaking individuals; and
(E) A description of  how the program coordinator will communicate with program partners
concerning persons participating in the program and  any other matter necessary for the adminis-
tration of the program.
(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, a deflection program:
(a) Must be coordinated by or in consultation with  a community mental health program, a local
mental health authority or a federally recognized tribal government;
(b) Must have a coordinator with the following program coordinator duties:
(A) Convening deflection program partners as needed for the operation of the program;
(B) Managing grant program funds awarded under this section; and
(C) Tracking and reporting data required by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission under
section 37 , chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ];
(c) Must involve the partners described in subsection (4)(c) of this section; and
(d) May involve a partnership with one or more of the following entities:
(A) A first responder agency other than a law enforcement agency;
(B) A community provider;
(C) A treatment provider;
(D) A community-based organization;
(E) A case management provider;
(F) A recovery support services provider; or
(G) Any other individual or  entity deemed necessary by the program coordinator to carry out
the purposes of the deflection program, including  individuals with lived experience with substance
use disorder, a behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders.
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 9
(6) During a grant application period established by the  committee, the maximum proportion of
grant funds available to an applicant shall be determined as follows:
(a) The proportion of grant funds  available to an applicant other than a tribal government shall
be determined based on the [ county formula share employed by the Oversight and Accountability
Council established under ORS 430.388 ] formula for distributing  grants and funding awarded
under ORS 430.389, but an applicant may not receive less than $150,000.
(b) The committee shall determine the proportion of funds  available to an applicant that is a
federally recognized tribal government.
(7)(a) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Deflection program expenses including but not  limited to law enforcement employees, deputy
district attorneys and behavioral health treatment workers, including peer navigators and  mobile
crisis and support services workers.
(B) Behavioral health workforce development.
(C) Capital construction of behavioral health treatment infrastructure.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the committee may award planning  grants
for the development of deflection programs.
(c) The committee may allocate up to three percent of program  funds to support grantee data
collection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures.
(8) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall provide staff support to the grant program.
(9) The committee and  the commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 9.
ORS 430.391 is repealed.
Passed by Senate May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 610 (SB 610-A) Page 10